Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.142

Food stamps—Trafficking.

A person who purchases, or who otherwise acquires and sells, or who traffics in, food stamps as defined by the federal food stamp act, as amended, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq., or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, is guilty of the following:

(1) A class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if the face value of the stamps or benefits exceeds one hundred dollars; or

(2) A gross misdemeanor if the face value of the stamps or benefits is one hundred dollars or less.

[ 2003 c 53 s 50.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.